Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 15
OTHER JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS

1-13.5-1501. Controversies.

When any controversy arises between any official charged with any duty or function under this article and any candidate or other person, the district court, upon the filing of a verified petition by any such official or person setting forth in concise form the nature of the controversy and the relief sought, shall issue an order commanding the respondent in the petition to appear before the court and answer under oath to the petition. It is the duty of the court to summarily hear and dispose of any such issues, with a view to obtaining a substantial compliance with this article by the parties to the controversy, and to make and enter orders and judgments and to follow the procedures of the court to enforce all such orders and judgments.

The proceedings may be reviewed and finally adjudicated by the supreme court of this state, if application to that court is made within five days after the termination by the court in which the petition was filed and if the supreme court is willing to assume jurisdiction of the case.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 57, § 6, effective February 18.